Vermont statutes. Title 23 Motor Vehicles
Subchapter 13. Drunken Driving
§ 1203.
Administration of tests; retention of test and videotape.

A breath test shall be administered only by a person who has been certified by the Vermont Criminal Justice Council to operate the breath testing equipment being employed. In any proceeding under this subchapter, a person’s testimony that he or she is certified to operate the breath testing equipment employed shall be prima facie evidence of that fact.

Subsection (b) effective until January 1, 2022; see also subsection (b) effective January 1, 2022 set out below.

Only a physician, licensed nurse, medical technician, physician assistant, medical technologist, laboratory assistant, intermediate or advanced emergency medical technician, or paramedic acting at the request of a law enforcement officer may, at a medical facility, police or fire department, or other safe and clean location as determined by the individual withdrawing blood, withdraw blood for the purpose of determining the presence of alcohol or another drug. A law enforcement officer, even if trained to withdraw blood, acting in that official capacity may not withdraw blood for the purpose of determining the presence of alcohol or another drug. These limitations do not apply to the taking of a breath sample. A medical facility or business may not charge more than $75.00 for services rendered when an individual is brought to a facility for the sole purpose of an evidentiary blood sample or when an emergency medical technician or paramedic draws an evidentiary blood sample.

(b) (1)

Subsection (b) effective January 1, 2022; see also subsection (b) effective until January 1, 2022 set out above.

Only a physician, licensed nurse, medical technician, physician assistant, medical technologist, laboratory assistant, intermediate or advanced emergency medical technician, or paramedic acting at the request of a law enforcement officer may, at a medical facility, police or fire department, or other safe and clean location as determined by the individual withdrawing blood, withdraw blood for the purpose of determining the presence of alcohol or another drug. Any withdrawal of blood shall not be taken at roadside, and a law enforcement officer, even if trained to withdraw blood, acting in that official capacity may not withdraw blood for the purpose of determining the presence of alcohol or another drug. These limitations do not apply to the taking of a breath sample. A medical facility or business may not charge more than $75.00 for services rendered when an individual is brought to a facility for the sole purpose of an evidentiary blood sample or when an emergency medical technician or paramedic draws an evidentiary blood sample.

(2)

A saliva sample may be obtained by a person authorized by the Vermont Criminal Justice Council to collect a saliva sample for the purpose of evidentiary testing to determine the presence of a drug. Any saliva sample obtained pursuant to this section shall not be taken at roadside.

Subsection (c) effective until January 1, 2022; see also subsection (c) effective January 1, 2022 set out below.

When a breath test that is intended to be introduced in evidence is taken with a crimper device or when blood is withdrawn at an officer’s request, a sufficient amount of breath or blood, as the case may be, shall be taken to enable the person to have made an independent analysis of the sample and shall be held for at least 45 days from the date the sample was taken. At any time during that period, the person may direct that the sample be sent to an independent laboratory of the person’s choosing for an independent analysis. The Department of Public Safety shall adopt rules providing for the security of the sample. At no time shall the defendant or any agent of the defendant have access to the sample. A preserved sample of breath shall not be required when an infrared breath-testing instrument is used. A person tested with an infrared breath-testing instrument shall have the option of having a second infrared test administered immediately after receiving the results of the first test.

(c)

Subsection (c) effective January 1, 2022; see also subsection (c) effective until January 1, 2022 set out above.

When blood or saliva is withdrawn at an officer’s request, a sufficient amount of saliva or blood, as the case may be, shall be taken to enable the person to have made an independent analysis of the sample and shall be held for at least 45 days from the date the sample was taken. At any time during that period, the person may direct that the sample be sent to an independent laboratory of the person’s choosing for an independent analysis. The Department of Public Safety shall adopt rules providing for the security of the sample. At no time shall the defendant or any agent of the defendant have access to the sample. A preserved sample of breath shall not be required when an infrared breath-testing instrument is used. A person tested with an infrared breath-testing instrument shall have the option of having a second infrared test administered immediately after receiving the results of the first test.

Subsection (d) effective until January 1, 2022; see also subsection (d) effective January 1, 2022 set out below.

In the case of a breath test administered using an infrared breath testing instrument, the test shall be analyzed in compliance with rules adopted by the Department of Public Safety. The analyses shall be retained by the State. A sample is adequate if the infrared breath testing instrument analyzes the sample and does not indicate the sample is deficient. Analysis of the person’s breath or blood that is available to that person for independent analysis shall be considered valid when performed according to methods approved by the Department of Public Safety. The analysis performed by the State shall be considered valid when performed according to a method or methods selected by the Department of Public Safety. The Department of Public Safety shall use rulemaking procedures to select its method or methods. Failure of a person to provide an adequate breath sample constitutes a refusal.

(d)

Subsection (d) effective January 1, 2022; see also subsection (d) effective until January 1, 2022 set out above.

In the case of a breath, saliva, or blood test, the test shall be analyzed in compliance with rules adopted by the Department of Public Safety. The analyses shall be retained by the State. A sample is adequate if the infrared breath testing instrument analyzes the sample and does not indicate the sample is deficient. An analysis of the person’s saliva or blood that is available to that person for independent analysis shall be considered valid when performed according to methods approved by the Department of Public Safety. The analysis performed by the State shall be considered valid when performed according to a method or methods selected by the Department of Public Safety. The Department of Public Safety shall use rulemaking procedures to select its method or methods. Failure of a person to provide an adequate breath or saliva sample constitutes a refusal.

[Repealed.]

Subsection (f) effective until January 1, 2022; see also subsection (f) effective January 1, 2022 set out below.

When a law enforcement officer has reason to believe that a person may be violating or has violated section 1201 of this title, the officer may request the person to provide a sample of breath for a preliminary screening test using a device approved by the Commissioner of Public Safety for this purpose. The person shall not have the right to consult an attorney prior to submitting to this preliminary breath alcohol screening test. The results of this preliminary screening test may be used for the purpose of deciding whether an arrest should be made and whether to request an evidentiary test and shall not be used in any court proceeding except on those issues. Following the screening test additional tests may be required of the operator pursuant to the provisions of section 1202 of this title.

(f)

Subsection (f) effective January 1, 2022; see also subsection (f) effective until January 1, 2022 set out above.

When a law enforcement officer has reason to believe that a person may be violating or has violated section 1201 of this title, the officer may request the person to provide a sample of breath for a preliminary screening test using a device approved by the Commissioner of Public Safety for this purpose. The person shall not have the right to consult an attorney prior to submitting to this preliminary breath alcohol screening. The results of this preliminary screening may be used for the purpose of deciding whether an arrest should be made and whether to request an evidentiary test and shall not be used in any court proceeding except on those issues. Following the screening, additional tests may be required of the operator pursuant to the provisions of section 1202 of this title.

The Office of the Chief Medical Examiner shall report in writing to the Department of Motor Vehicles the death of any person as the result of a crash involving a vehicle and the circumstances of such crash within five days of such death.

Subsection (h) effective until January 1, 2022; see also subsection (h) effective January 1, 2022 set out below.

A Vermont law enforcement officer shall have a right to request a breath or blood sample in an adjoining state or country under this section unless prohibited by the law of the other state or country. If the law in an adjoining state or country does not prohibit an officer acting under this section from taking a breath or blood sample in its jurisdiction, evidence of such sample shall not be excluded in the courts of this State solely on the basis that the test was taken outside the State.

(h)

Subsection (h) effective January 1, 2022; see also subsection (h) effective until January 1, 2022 set out above.

A Vermont law enforcement officer shall have a right to request a breath, saliva, or blood sample in an adjoining state or country under this section unless prohibited by the law of the other state or country. If the law in an adjoining state or country does not prohibit an officer acting under this section from taking a breath, saliva, or blood sample in its jurisdiction, evidence of such sample shall not be excluded in the courts of this State solely on the basis that the test was taken outside the State.

The Commissioner of Public Safety shall adopt emergency rules relating to the operation, maintenance, and use of preliminary alcohol screening devices for use by law enforcement officers in enforcing the provisions of this title. The Commissioner shall consider relevant standards of the National Highway Traffic Safety Administration in adopting such rules. Any preliminary alcohol screening device authorized for use under this title shall be on the qualified products list of the National Highway Traffic Safety Administration.

A videotape made of the alleged offense and subsequent processing may be erased or destroyed by the law enforcement agency no earlier than 90 days after final judgment, or, if no civil or criminal action is filed, no earlier than 90 days after the date the videotape was made.

A copy of a videotape made of the alleged offense shall be provided to the defendant within ten days after the defendant requests the copy and pays a $45.00 fee for its reproduction. No fee shall be charged to a defendant whom the court has determined to be indigent.

HISTORY:

Added

1969, No. 267

(Adj. Sess.), § 3; amended

1971, No. 14

, § 8, eff. March 11, 1971;

1971, No. 260

(Adj. Sess.), § 48;

1973, No. 79

, § 3, eff. May 23, 1973;

1975, No. 103

, § 1, eff. May 30, 1975;

1981, No. 103

, § 4;

1989, No. 68

, § 4, eff. Dec. 1, 1989;

1991, No. 55

, § 4;

1991, No. 57

, §§ 1, 4, eff. July 4, 1991;

1997, No. 57

, § 2;

1999, No. 160

(Adj. Sess.), § 17, eff. May 29, 2000;

2007, No. 153

(Adj. Sess.), § 2;

2011, No. 56

, § 14, eff. March 1, 2012;

2019, No. 59

, § 28;

2019, No. 164

(Adj. Sess.), § 24, eff. Jan. 1, 2022;

2021, No. 65

, § 10, eff. Jan. 1, 2022.

§ 1203a.
Independent chemical test; blood tests.

A person tested has the right at the person’s own expense to have someone of the person’s own choosing administer a chemical test or tests in addition to any administered at the direction of the law enforcement officer under section 1203 of this title. The failure or inability to obtain an additional test or tests by a person shall not preclude the admission in evidence of the test taken at the direction of an enforcement officer unless the additional test was prevented or denied by the enforcement officer.

Subsection (b) effective until January 1, 2022; see also subsection (b) effective January 1, 2022 set out below.

Arrangements for a blood test shall be made by the person submitting to the evidentiary breath test, by the person’s attorney, or by some other person acting on the person’s behalf unless the person is detained in custody after administration of the evidentiary test and upon completion of processing, in which case the law enforcement officer having custody of the person shall make arrangements for administration of the blood test upon demand but at the person’s own expense.

(b)

Subsection (b) effective January 1, 2022; see also subsection (b) effective until January 1, 2022 set out above.

Arrangements for a blood test shall be made by the person submitting to the evidentiary breath or saliva test, by the person’s attorney, or by some other person acting on the person’s behalf unless the person is detained in custody after administration of the evidentiary test and upon completion of processing, in which case the law enforcement officer having custody of the person shall make arrangements for administration of the blood test upon demand but at the person’s own expense.

If after reasonable efforts the person is unable to arrange transportation necessary to obtain the blood test upon completion of processing, the law enforcement officer shall provide or arrange transportation to a facility available to administer the test unless, for good cause, the officer is unable to do so. This subsection shall only apply if the person was tested with an infrared testing device.

The physician, licensed nurse, medical technician, physician assistant, medical technologist, or laboratory assistant drawing a sample of blood shall use a sample collection kit provided by the Department of Public Safety or another type of collection kit. The sample shall be identified as to donor, date, and time; sealed; and mailed to the Department of Public Safety where it shall be held for a period of at least 45 days from the date the sample was taken. At any time during that period, the person may direct that the sample be sent to an independent laboratory of the person’s choosing for an independent analysis. The Department of Public Safety may recover its costs of supplies, handling, and storage.

The person requesting the sample is responsible for the costs of transportation, drawing the sample, and subsequent analysis. If the facility where the sample is drawn is unable to obtain payment from the person at the time the sample is drawn or within a reasonable time thereafter, the facility shall be entitled to reimbursement from the Office of the Defender General. The Office of the Defender General may recoup those costs and the court may impose conditions of release or probation for that purpose.

The facility, physician, licensed nurse, medical technician, physician assistant, medical technologist, or laboratory assistant drawing blood shall in no manner be liable in any civil or criminal action except for negligence in drawing the blood.

HISTORY:

Added

1991, No. 57

, § 3, eff. July 4, 1991; amended

2011, No. 56

, § 15, eff. March 1, 2012;

2013, No. 34

, § 30a;

2019, No. 164

(Adj. Sess.), § 25, eff. Jan. 1, 2022;

2021, No. 20

, § 241.

§ 1203b.
Duty to report blood test results.

Notwithstanding any law or court rule to the contrary, if a health care provider who is providing health services to a person in the emergency room of a health care facility as a result of a motor vehicle crash becomes aware as a result of any blood test performed in the health care facility that the person’s blood alcohol level meets or exceeds the level prohibited by law, the health care provider shall report that fact, as soon as is reasonably possible, to a law enforcement agency having jurisdiction over the location where the crash occurred.

Any person who in good faith reports the results of a blood test pursuant to the provisions of subsection (a) of this section shall be immune from any civil or criminal liability that might otherwise be incurred or imposed as a result of making a report.

Any person who violates subsection (a) of this section shall be assessed a civil penalty of not more than $500.00.

A report made under this section, the fact that a report was made, and the results of the blood test that required the report shall not be admissible in any criminal case without the consent of the person whose blood was tested.

A report made under the provisions of this section shall not be considered a waiver of the patient’s privilege.

As used in this section:

“Health care facility” shall be defined as provided in

18 V.S.A. § 9432(8)

.

“Health care provider” shall be defined as provided in

18 V.S.A. § 9432(9)

.

“Health services” shall be defined as provided in

18 V.S.A. § 9432(10)

.

Health care facilities have a responsibility to ensure that all health care providers who work in the health care facility and may provide health care to a person injured as a result of a motor vehicle crash are aware of their responsibilities under this section. Every health care facility that provides health care to persons injured as a result of motor vehicle crashes shall:

adopt a policy that implements this section;

provide a copy of the policy to all health care providers who work in the health care facility who may provide health care to a person as a result of a motor vehicle crash; and

conduct an educational and training program within one month of employment for all health care providers who work at the health care facility who may provide health care to an individual as a result of a motor vehicle crash.

HISTORY:

Added

1997, No. 117

(Adj. Sess.), § 15; amended

2019, No. 131

(Adj. Sess.), § 190;

2021, No. 76

, § 3.

§ 1204.
Permissive inferences.

Upon the trial of any civil or criminal action or proceeding arising out of acts alleged to have been committed by a person while operating, attempting to operate, or in actual physical control of a vehicle on a highway, the person’s alcohol concentration shall give rise to the following permissive inferences:

If the person’s alcohol concentration at that time was less than 0.08, such fact shall not give rise to any presumption or permissive inference that the person was or was not under the influence of alcohol, but such fact may be considered with other competent evidence in determining whether the person was under the influence of alcohol.

If the person’s alcohol concentration at that time was 0.08 or more, it shall be a permissive inference that the person was under the influence of alcohol in violation of subdivision 1201(a)(2) or (3) of this title.

If the person’s alcohol concentration at any time within two hours of the alleged offense was 0.10 or more, it shall be a permissive inference that the person was under the influence of alcohol in violation of subdivision 1201(a)(2) or (3) of this title.

The foregoing provisions shall not be construed as limiting the introduction of any other competent evidence bearing upon the question whether the person was under the influence of alcohol or under the combined influence of alcohol and another drug, nor shall they be construed as requiring that evidence of the amount of alcohol or drug in the person’s blood, breath, urine, or saliva must be presented.

HISTORY:

Added

1969, No. 267

(Adj. Sess.), § 4; amended

1973, No. 79

, § 4, eff. May 23, 1973;

1981, No. 103

, § 5;

1987, No. 244

(Adj. Sess.);

1991, No. 55

, § 5;

2017, No. 83

, § 161(4);

2019, No. 164

(Adj. Sess.), § 26, eff. Oct. 7, 2020.

§ 1205.
Civil suspension; summary procedure.

Refusal; alcohol concentration above legal limits; suspension periods.

Upon affidavit of a law enforcement officer that the officer had reasonable grounds to believe that the person was operating, attempting to operate, or in actual physical control of a vehicle in violation of section 1201 of this title and that the person refused to submit to a test, the Commissioner shall suspend the person’s operating license or nonresident operating privilege or the privilege of an unlicensed operator to operate a vehicle for a period of six months and until the person complies with section 1209a of this title. However, during the suspension, an eligible person may operate under the terms of an ignition interlock RDL or ignition interlock certificate issued pursuant to section 1213 of this title.

Upon affidavit of a law enforcement officer that the officer had reasonable grounds to believe that the person was operating, attempting to operate, or in actual physical control of a vehicle in violation of section 1201 of this title and that the person submitted to a test and the test results indicated that the person’s alcohol concentration was above a limit specified in subsection 1201(a) of this title, at the time of operating, attempting to operate, or being in actual physical control, the Commissioner shall suspend the person’s operating license or nonresident operating privilege or the privilege of an unlicensed operator to operate a vehicle for a period of 90 days and until the person complies with section 1209a of this title. However, during the suspension, an eligible person may operate under the terms of an ignition interlock RDL or ignition interlock certificate issued pursuant to section 1213 of this title.

Upon affidavit of a law enforcement officer that the officer had reasonable grounds to believe that the person was operating, attempting to operate, or in actual physical control of a vehicle in violation of subdivision 1201(d)(2) of this title and that the person submitted to a test and the test results indicated that the person’s alcohol concentration was 0.02 or more at the time of operating, attempting to operate, or being in actual physical control, the Commissioner shall suspend the person’s operating license or nonresident operating privilege or the privilege of an unlicensed operator to operate a vehicle for life. However, during the suspension, an eligible person may operate under the terms of an ignition interlock RDL or ignition interlock certificate issued under section 1213 of this title.

Form of officer’s affidavit. A law enforcement officer’s affidavit in support of a suspension under this section shall be in a standardized form for use throughout the State and shall be sufficient if it contains the following statements:

The officer is a certified law enforcement officer.

The officer who administered the test was certified to operate the testing equipment.

The officer had reasonable grounds to believe the person was operating, attempting to operate, or in actual physical control of a vehicle in violation of section 1201 of this title (noting the time and date of operating, attempting to operate, or being in actual physical control).

The officer informed the person of his or her rights under subsection 1202(d) of this title.

The officer obtained an evidentiary test (noting the time and date the test was taken) and the test indicated that the person’s alcohol concentration was above a legal limit specified in subsection 1201(a) or (d) of this title, or the person refused to submit to an evidentiary test.

The officer complied with the Soldiers and Sailors Civil Relief Act (50 U.S.C. § 501 et seq.).

The officer confirmed the person’s correct mailing address.

Notice of suspension. On behalf of the Commissioner of Motor Vehicles, a law enforcement officer requesting or directing the administration of an evidentiary test shall serve notice of intention to suspend and of suspension on a person who refuses to submit to an evidentiary test or on a person who submits to a test the results of which indicate that the person’s alcohol concentration was above a legal limit specified in subsection 1201(a) or (d) of this title, at the time of operating, attempting to operate, or being in actual physical control of a vehicle in violation of section 1201 of this title. The notice shall be signed by the law enforcement officer requesting the test. A copy of the notice shall be sent to the Commissioner of Motor Vehicles, and a copy shall be mailed or given to the defendant within three business days of the date the officer receives the results of the test. If mailed, the notice is deemed received three days after mailing to the address provided by the defendant to the law enforcement officer. A copy of the affidavit of the law enforcement officer shall also be mailed first-class mail or given to the defendant within seven days of the date of notice.

Form of notice. The notice of intention to suspend and of suspension shall be in a form prescribed by the Supreme Court. The notice shall include an explanation of rights, a form to be used to request a hearing, and, if a hearing is requested, the date, time, and location of the Criminal Division of the Superior Court where the person must appear for a preliminary hearing. The notice shall also contain, in boldface print, the following:

You have the right to ask for a hearing to contest the suspension of your operator’s license.

This notice shall serve as a temporary operator’s license and is valid until 12:01 a.m. of the date of suspension. If this is your first violation of section 1201 of this title and if you do not request a hearing, your license will be suspended as provided in this notice. If this is your second or subsequent violation of section 1201 of this title, your license will be suspended on the 11th day after you receive this notice. It is a crime to drive while your license is suspended unless you have been issued an ignition interlock restricted driver’s license or ignition interlock certificate.

If you wish to request a hearing before the Criminal Division of the Superior Court, you must mail or deliver your request for a hearing within seven days after (date of notice).

If your request for a hearing is not mailed or delivered within seven days after (date of notice), you waive your right to a hearing and your license will be suspended as provided in this notice.

In order to request a hearing, sign the attached form and mail or deliver the form to the Commissioner of Motor Vehicles at the address shown.

If you are charged with a second or subsequent violation of section 1201 of this title, no person shall sell, transfer, or encumber the title to a vehicle that may be subject to immobilization or forfeiture, unless approved by the court in which the charge is filed for good cause shown.

Effective date of suspension.

First offense. Unless a hearing is requested, a suspension under this section of the license of a person who the officer has reasonable grounds to believe violated section 1201 of this title a first time becomes effective on the 11th day after the person receives notice or is deemed to have received notice under subsection (c) of this section. If a hearing is requested, a suspension shall not become effective unless the court orders a suspension after hearing as provided in this section.

Second or subsequent offense. A suspension of a person’s license under this section shall become effective on the 11th day after the person receives notice or is deemed to have received notice under subsection (c) of this section if:

the officer has reasonable grounds to believe the person has violated section 1201 of this title; and

within the last 20 years, the person has:

had his or her operator’s license suspended pursuant to this section; or

been convicted of a violation of section 1201 of this title.

Review by Superior Court. Within seven days following receipt of a notice of intention to suspend and of suspension, a person may make a request for a hearing before the Superior Court by mailing or delivering the form provided with the notice. The request shall be mailed or delivered to the Commissioner of Motor Vehicles, who shall then notify the Criminal Division of the Superior Court that a hearing has been requested and provide the State’s Attorney with a copy of the notice of intention to suspend and of suspension and the officer’s affidavit.

Preliminary hearing. The preliminary hearing shall be held within 21 days of the alleged offense. Unless impracticable or continued for good cause shown, the date of the preliminary hearing shall be the same as the date of the first appearance in any criminal case resulting from the same incident for which the person received a citation to appear in court. The preliminary hearing shall be held in accordance with procedures prescribed by the Supreme Court.

Final hearing.

If the defendant requests a hearing on the merits, the court shall schedule a final hearing on the merits to be held within 21 days of the date of the preliminary hearing. In no event may a final hearing occur more than 42 days after the date of the alleged offense without the consent of the defendant or for good cause shown. The final hearing may only be continued by the consent of the defendant or for good cause shown. The issues at the final hearing shall be limited to the following:

Whether the law enforcement officer had reasonable grounds to believe the person was operating, attempting to operate, or in actual physical control of a vehicle in violation of section 1201 of this title.

Whether at the time of the request for the evidentiary test the officer informed the person of the person’s rights and the consequences of taking and refusing the test substantially as set out in subsection 1202(d) of this title.

Whether the person refused to permit the test.

Whether the test was taken and the test results indicated that the person’s alcohol concentration was above a legal limit specified in subsection 1201(a) or (d) of this title, at the time of operating, attempting to operate, or being in actual physical control of a vehicle in violation of section 1201 of this title, whether the testing methods used were valid and reliable, and whether the test results were accurate and accurately evaluated. Evidence that the test was taken and evaluated in compliance with rules adopted by the Department of Public Safety shall be prima facie evidence that the testing methods used were valid and reliable and that the test results are accurate and were accurately evaluated.

Whether the requirements of section 1202 of this title were complied with.

No less than seven days before the final hearing, and subject to the requirements of Vermont Rule of Civil Procedure 11, the defendant shall provide to the State and file with the court a list of the issues (limited to the issues set forth in this subsection) that the defendant intends to raise. Only evidence that is relevant to an issue listed by the defendant may be raised by the defendant at the final hearing. The defendant shall not be permitted to raise any other evidence at the final hearing, and all other evidence shall be inadmissible.

Finding by the court. The court shall electronically forward a report of the hearing to the Commissioner. Upon a finding by the court that the law enforcement officer had reasonable grounds to believe that the person was operating, attempting to operate, or in actual physical control of a vehicle in violation of section 1201 of this title and that the person refused to submit to a test, or upon a finding by the court that the law enforcement officer had reasonable grounds to believe that the person was operating, attempting to operate, or in actual physical control of a vehicle in violation of section 1201 of this title and that the person submitted to a test and the test results indicated that the person’s alcohol concentration was above a legal limit specified in subsection 1201(a) or (d) of this title, at the time the person was operating, attempting to operate, or in actual physical control, the person’s operating license, or nonresident operating privilege, or the privilege of an unlicensed operator to operate a vehicle shall be suspended or shall remain suspended for the required term and until the person complies with section 1209a of this title. Upon a finding in favor of the person, the Commissioner shall cause the suspension to be canceled and removed from the record, without payment of any fee.

(j)

Venue and conduct of hearings.

Venue for proceedings under this section shall be in the territorial unit of the Superior Court where the offense is alleged to have occurred. Hearings under this section shall be summary proceedings conducted by the Criminal Division of the Superior Court without a jury and shall be subject to the Vermont Rules of Civil Procedure only as consistent with this section. The State has the burden of proof by a preponderance of the evidence. Affidavits of law enforcement officers, chemists of either party, or expert witnesses of either party shall be admissible evidence, which may be rebutted by witnesses called by either party. The affidavits shall be delivered to the other party at least five days prior to the hearing.

(k)

Appeal.

A decision of the Criminal Division of the Superior Court under this section may be appealed as a matter of right to the Supreme Court. The suspension shall not be stayed pending appeal unless the defendant is reasonably likely to prevail on appeal.

(
l
)

Access to information.

In connection with a proceeding under this section, the operator shall have access to all written statements and information in the possession and control of the State concerning the evidentiary test or tests, including the police report, processing forms, certification and affidavit, breath test results, police notes, and the names and addresses of witnesses. If the operator intends to rely on the independent analysis, the State shall have access to the test results from the independent analysis and names and addresses of all witnesses. No depositions or written interrogatories shall be permitted except in extraordinary circumstances.

(m)

Second and subsequent suspensions.

For a second suspension under this subchapter, the period of suspension shall be 18 months and until the person complies with section 1209a of this title. However, during the suspension, an eligible person may operate under the terms of an ignition interlock RDL or ignition interlock certificate issued pursuant to section 1213 of this title. For a third or subsequent suspension under this subchapter, the period of suspension shall be life. However, during this lifetime suspension, an eligible person may operate under the terms of an ignition interlock RDL or ignition interlock certificate issued under section 1213 of this title.

(n)

Presumption.

In a proceeding under this section, if at any time within two hours of operating, attempting to operate, or being in actual physical control of a vehicle a person had an alcohol concentration of above a legal limit specified in subsection 1201(a) or (d) of this title, it shall be a rebuttable presumption that the person’s alcohol concentration was above the applicable limit at the time of operating, attempting to operate, or being in actual physical control.

(o)

Use immunity.

No testimony or other information presented by the defendant in connection with a proceeding under this section or any information directly or indirectly derived from such testimony or other information, may be used for any purpose, including impeachment and cross-examination, against the defendant in any criminal case, except a prosecution for perjury or giving a false statement.

(p)

Suspensions to run concurrently.

Suspensions imposed under this section or any comparable statute of any other jurisdiction and sections 1206, 1208, and 1216 of this title or any comparable statutes of any other jurisdiction, or any suspension resulting from a conviction for a violation of section 1091 of this title from the same incident, shall run concurrently and a person shall receive credit for any elapsed period of a suspension served in Vermont against a later suspension imposed in this State.

(q)

Rules.

The Supreme Court shall adopt rules ensuring the fairness of proceedings under this section.

(r)

Surcharge; Public Defender Special Fund; DUI Enforcement Special Fund.

A person suspended under this section for a refusal shall be assessed a surcharge of $50.00 that shall be collected by the Department of Motor Vehicles prior to reinstatement of the person’s driving privileges. The Department shall transfer the surcharge assessed under this subsection to the Public Defender Special Fund created in

13 V.S.A. § 5239

specifying the source of the monies being deposited. All such monies shall be used by the Office of the Defender General to cover the cost of providing statewide 24-hour legal services coverage as required by subsection 1202(g) of this title. After $40,000.00 has been deposited in the Public Defender Special Fund in a single fiscal year, all additional collected surcharges assessed under this subsection in that fiscal year shall be credited to the Governor’s Highway Safety Commission for deposit in a DUI Enforcement Special Fund established and managed pursuant to 32 V.S.A. chapter 7, subchapter 5. All such DUI Enforcement Special Fund receipts shall be used exclusively for statewide DUI enforcement and for no other purpose.

(s)

[Repealed.]

(t)

Nonmandatory time limits.

For a first offense, the time limits set forth in subsections (g) and (h) of this section are directive only and shall not be interpreted by the court to be mandatory or jurisdictional.

(u)

Testimony by telephone.

In any proceeding under this section, for cause shown, a party’s chemist may be allowed to testify by telephone in lieu of a personal appearance.

HISTORY:

Added

1969, No. 267

(Adj. Sess.), § 5; amended

1971, No. 14

, § 9, eff. March 11, 1971;

1973, No. 79

, § 5, eff. May 23, 1973;

1975, No. 103

, § 2, eff. May 30, 1975;

1979, No. 58

, § 1;

1981, No. 103

, § 6;

1983, No. 134

(Adj. Sess.), § 4;

1989, No. 68

, § 5, eff. Dec. 1, 1989;

1991, No. 55

, § 6;

1995, No. 77

(Adj. Sess.), § 8, eff. March 21, 1996;

1995, No. 112

(Adj. Sess.), § 12, eff. April 22, 1996;

1997, No. 56

, §§ 4, 7, eff. Aug. 1, 1997;

1997, No. 117

(Adj. Sess.), § 16;

1999, No. 160

(Adj. Sess.), § 18, eff. May 29, 2000;

2001, No. 146

(Adj. Sess.), § 3;

2009, No. 126

(Adj. Sess.), § 4, eff. July 1, 2011;

2009, No. 154

(Adj. Sess.), § 160;

2011, No. 46

, § 8, eff. July 2, 2011;

2011, No. 56

, §§ 4, 16, eff. March 1, 2012;

2011, No. 90

(Adj. Sess.), § 7;

2013, No. 57

, § 19;

2015, No. 158

(Adj. Sess.), § 49;

2019, No. 32

, § 8;

2019, No. 131

(Adj. Sess.), § 191.